District of Columbia statutes.
4-321

Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Adoption assistance state” means the state that is signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case.

(2)

“Department” means the District of Columbia Department of Human Services.

(3)

“Residence state” means the state where the child is living.

(4)

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, or a Territory or Possession of or administered by the United States.

History

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 401, 47 DCR 2850